Utah statutes.
53A-13-201.   Driver education established by school districts.
(1)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Driver education" includes classroom instruction and driving and
observation in a dual-controlled motor vehicle.
(b)  "Driving" or "behind-the-wheel driving" means operating a dual-controlled
motor vehicle under the supervision of a certified instructor.
(2) (a)  Local school districts may establish and maintain driver education
for pupils.
(b)  A school or local school district that provides driver education shall
provide an opportunity for each pupil enrolled in that school or local school
district to take the written test when the pupil is 15 years and nine months
of age.
(c)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (2)(b), a school or local
school district that provides driver education may provide an opportunity for
each pupil enrolled in that school or school district to take the written test
when the pupil is 15 years of age.
(3)  The purpose of driver education is to help develop the knowledge,
attitudes, habits, and skills necessary for the safe operation of motor
vehicles.
(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules for driver education
offered in the public schools.
(5)  The rules under Subsection (4) shall:
(a)  require at least one hour of classroom training on the subject of
railroad crossing safety for each driver education pupil; and
(b)  establish minimum standards for approved driving ranges under Section
53-3-505.5.
(6)  The requirements of Section 53-3-505.5 apply to any behind-the-wheel
driving training provided as part of driver education offered under this part
and used to satisfy the driver training requirement under Section 53-3-204.
